District of Columbia statutes.
32-1608

Anti-displacement.

Participants in training activities funded pursuant to § 32-1607 shall not be assigned or placed to work for any employer or worksite where:

(1)

Any other individual is laid off from the same or substantially equivalent job;

(2)

An employer has terminated a regular employee and filled the vacancy with a participant;

(3)

An employer has caused an involuntary reduction in the workforce and filled the vacancy with a participant;

(4)

An employer has caused an involuntary reduction below full-time hours of any employee in the same or substantially equivalent job;

(5)

An employer has caused an involuntary reduction in wages or employment benefits;

(6)

Placement of a recipient will violate an existing collective bargaining agreement, unless the labor organization and the employer provide a written concurrence;

(7)

The job is created in a promotional line that will infringe in any way upon the promotional opportunities of currently employed individuals;

(8)

The placement is the equivalent of filling an established unfilled position vacancy, or is the equivalent of performing a job that is substantially similar to the vacant position, unless the participant is given a bona fide opportunity to apply for the position as an unsubsidized employee after 18 weeks of satisfactory service in the position; or

(9)

There is a hiring freeze for positions that are the same or substantially similar to the position performed by the participants.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-150, § 9, 47 DCR 4644
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-263, § 2(h), 62 DCR 1518
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-263 rewrote the introductory language.